pl: Mechanizm dozowania wykałaczek: Czujnik automatyczny; Podwójny slot; Klapa uchylna; Grawitacyjne; Pokrywa podnoszona; Przycisk; Pokrywka przesuwna; Sprężynowe; Mechanizm obrotowy; Inne
cs: Mechanismus dávkování párátek: Automatický senzor; Dva otvory; Flip-top; Gravitační; Vytahovací; Tlačítko; Posuvné víko; Pružinové; Otočný dávkovač; Jiné
bg-BG: Механизъм за дозиране на клечки за зъби: Автоматичен сензор; Двоен отвор; С отварящ се капак; Гравитационно подаване; С издърпване; Бутон за натискане; Плъзгащ се капак; Пружинно; Дозиране със завъртане; Друго
zh-TW: 牙籤分配機制: 自動感應器; 雙槽; 翻蓋式; 重力式; 上拉式; 按鈕; 滑蓋式; 彈簧式; 旋轉式; 其他
lt-LT: Dantų krapštukų išdavimo mechanizmas: Automatinis jutiklis; Dvigubas lizdas; Atverčiamas dangtelis; Gravitacinis padavimas; Patraukiamas viršus; Paspaudžiamas mygtukas; Stumdomas dangtelis; Spyruoklinis; Pasukamas dozatorius; Kita
ro-RO: Mecanism de distribuire a scobitorilor: Senzor automat; Fantă dublă; Cu clapetă; Alimentare gravitațională; Vârf detașabil; Buton cu apăsare; Capac glisant; Cu arc; Dozare prin răsucire; Altele
th: กลไกการจ่ายไม้จิ้มฟัน: เซ็นเซอร์อัตโนมัติ; ช่องจ่ายสองช่อง; เปิดฝาด้านบน; ป้อนฟีดแรงโน้มถ่วง; ดึงฝาขึ้น; ปุ่มกด; ฝาเลื่อน; มีสปริง; บิดเพื่อจ่าย; อื่นๆ
fr: Mécanisme de distribution des cure-dents: Capteur automatique; Double emplacement; Ouverture par le haut; À alimentation par gravité; Couvercle à tirer; Bouton Push; Couvercle coulissant; À ressort; Distribution par rotation; Autre
tr: Kürdan dağıtım mekanizması: Otomatik sensör; Çift hazne; Kaldır aç; Yerçekimi beslemeli; Çekmeli kapak; Basmalı düğme; Sürgülü kapak; Yay mekanizmalı; Çevirerek çıkarma; Diğer
da: Dispenseringsmekanisme til tandstikkere: Automatisk sensor; Dobbelåbning; Flip-top; Tyngdekraft; Træksnor; Tryk på knap; Skydelåg; Fjederbaseret; Drejedispensering; Andet
pt-PT: Mecanismo dispensador de palitos: Sensor automático; Ranhura dupla; Tampa articulada; Funciona por gravidade; Puxar a tampa; Botão de pressão; Tampa deslizante; Com mola; Rodar para dispensar; Outro
sk-SK: Mechanizmus dávkovania špáradla: Automatický senzor; Dvojitý otvor; Odklápací vrch; Gravitačné plnenie; Vyťahovací vrch; Tlačidlo; Posuvné veko; Napnutý pružinou; Výber otočením; Iné
de: Mechanismus des Zahnstocherspenders: Automatischer Sensor; Doppelsteckplatz; Klappdeckel; Schwerkraftzuführung; Oben öffnen; Druckknopf; Schiebedeckel; Federbelastet; Drehspender; Sonstiges
nb: Tannpirker-dispensermekanisme: Automatisk sensor; Dobbeltspor; Vippekork; Tyngdekraftsmating; Trekk i toppen; Trykknapp; Skyv lokket; Fjærbelastet; Vri dispensering; Annet
es: Mecanismo dispensador de mondadientes: Sensor automático; Doble ranura; Tapa superior; Dispensador por gravedad; Tirar de la parte superior; Pulsador; Tapa deslizante; Con resorte; Dispensador giratorio; Otros
fi: Hammastikkujen annostelumekanismi: Automaattinen anturi; Kaksi paikkaa; Läppäkorkki; Painovoimatoiminen; Vedettävä yläosa; Painike; Liukuva kansi; Jousikuormitteinen; Kierrettävä annostelija; Muu
nl: Tandenstoker-doseermechanisme: Automatische sensor; Dubbele sleuf; Klapdeksel; Zwaartekracht; Treklip; Drukknop; Schuifdeksel; Veer; Draaien om te doseren; Overig
ja: つまようじ供給機構: 自動センター; デュアルスロット; フリップトップ; 重力フィード; プルトップ; プッシュボタン; スライドふた; スプリング式; ツイストディスペンス; その他
hr-HR: Mehanizam dispenzera čačkalica: Automatski senzor; Dvostruki utor; Preklopni poklopac; Gravitacijski dovod; Povlačni poklopac; Gumb; Klizni klopac; S oprugom; Okretni dozator; Ostalo
hu: Fogpiszkáló adagoló mechanizmusa: Automatikus érzékelő; Kettős nyílás; Felnyíló fedél; Gravitációs adagolás; Felhúzható fedél; Nyomógomb; Csúszófedél; Rugós; Csavaros adagoló; Egyéb
vi: Cơ chế phân phối tăm: Cảm biến tự động; Khe đôi; Hộp lật nắp; Cấp bằng trọng lực; Nắp kéo; Nút ấn; Nắp trượt; Chịu tải bằng lò xo; Lấy đồ bằng cách vặn; Khác
pt-BR: Mecanismo dispensador de palitos de dente: Sensor automático; Abertura dupla; Tampa flip top; Alimentação por gravidade; Tampa de puxar; Botão-pressão; Tampa deslizante; Com mola; Dispensação por giro; Outro
sv: Utmatningsmekanism för tandpetare: Automatisk sensor; Dubbel kortplats; Snäpplock; Gravitationsmatning; Dra-upp-lock; Tryckknapp; Skjutlock; Fjäderladdad; Vriddispensering; Annat
ko: 이쑤시개 배출 메커니즘: 자동 센서; 듀얼 슬롯; 플립탑; 중력 공급식; 당김식; 푸시 버튼; 미닫이식; 스프링 탑재; 회전식; 기타
en: Toothpick dispensing mechanism: Automatic sensor; Dual slot; Flip top; Gravity fed; Pull top; Push button; Slide lid; Spring loaded; Twist dispense; Other
zh-CN: 牙签分配机制: 自动感应; 双槽; 翻盖; 重力进液; 拉盖; 按压式; 滑盖; 弹簧式; 旋转出签; 其他
it: Meccanismo di erogazione degli stuzzicadenti: Sensore automatico; Doppio slot; Flip top; Alimentazione a gravità; Apertura a strappo; Pulsante; Coperchio scorrevole; Caricato a molla; Dispensatore a rotazione; Altro
ru: Механизм выдачи зубочисток: Автоматический (сенсорный); Двойной слот; Откидная крышка; Гравитационный; Откидной верх; Кнопочный; Сдвижная крышка; Пружинный; Поворотный дозатор; Другое
sl-SI: Mehanizem za izdajanje zobotrebcev: Avtomatski senzor; Dvojna reža; Navojni sklopni pokrovček; Gravitacijsko napajanje; Potegni za vrvico; Pritisni gumb; Potisni pokrov; Vzmetna; Odmerjanje z zasukom; Druga
el: Μηχανισμός διανομής οδοντογλυφίδων: Με αυτόματο αισθητήρα; Διπλή υποδοχή; Καπάκι αναδιπλούμενο; Τροφοδοσία βαρύτητας; Τραβήξτε το πάνω μέρος; Μηχανισμός με κουμπί; Σύρετε το καπάκι; Με ελατήριο; Περιστρέψτε τη διανομή; Άλλο